Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3398.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; THRIVE FAMILY RECOVERY RESOURCES.new text end new text begin $200,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $200,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for a grant to Thrive Family Recovery Resources for educating families and the workforce, offering nonbillable family peer services throughout Minnesota, integrating generational trauma work for the family system, and working with parents coming out of incarceration and child protective services to help families heal together. new text end